Illinois, session 104th, HB383.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Bill of Rights for Children is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 115/1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1351)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act shall be known and and may be 8cited as the Bill of Rights for Children.9(Source: P.A. 86-862.)